Massachusetts, session 194th, S2402.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The General Laws are hereby amended by inserting after chapter 182 the
following chapter:-
Chapter 182A. Peer to peer car sharing
Section 1. As used in this section the following words have the following meanings:-
(a) “Personal vehicle sharing program”, a legal entity qualified to do business in this state
engaged in the business of facilitating the sharing of private passenger motor vehicles for
noncommercial use by individuals within this state.
(b) “Department”, the department of public utilities.
of 3

Section 2. (a) In consultation with the department, a personal vehicle sharing program
shall provide the vehicle registration information of each vehicle offered for rent to the
department and to the Massachusetts Department of Transportation.
(b) A personal vehicle sharing program shall provide clear and conspicuous
transportation cost estimates to consumers including potential additional charges.
(c) A personal vehicle sharing program shall affix a clear and conspicuous symbol to
each vehicle in use by any person other than its owner through a personal vehicle sharing
program. The symbol shall be approved by the department of public utilities prior to use of any
vehicle through a personal vehicle sharing program.
(d) In consultation with state police, local law enforcement and the registry of motor
vehicles, the department shall ensure the safety and inspection of vehicles in the network of the
personal vehicle sharing program.
Section 3. (a) If the department determines, after notice and a hearing, that a personal
vehicle sharing program is in violation of this section or any rule or regulation promulgated
under this section, the department shall issue a monetary penalty or take other action that the
department deems necessary. In determining the amount of the monetary penalty, the department
shall consider, without limitation, the size of the personal vehicle sharing program based on a
personal vehicle sharing program’s intrastate operating revenues for the previous calendar year,
the gravity of the violation, the degree to which the personal vehicle sharing program exercised
good faith in attempting to achieve compliance or to remedy non-compliance and previous
violations by the personal vehicle sharing program cited by the department.
of 3

The department shall issue rules and regulations to establish a process for administrative
appeal of any penalty, suspension or revocation imposed in accordance with this section.
(b) Any party aggrieved by a final order or decision of the department pursuant to this
section may institute proceedings for judicial review in the superior court within 30 days after
receipt of such order or decision. Any proceedings in the superior court shall, insofar as
applicable, be governed by the provisions of section 14 of chapter 30A, and may be instituted in
the superior court for the county (i) where the parties or any of them reside or have their
principal place of business within the commonwealth; (ii) where the department has its principal
place of business; or (iii) of Suffolk. The commencement of such proceedings shall not, unless
specifically ordered by the court, operate as a stay of the department’s order or decision.
Section 4. The department in consultation with the Massachusetts Department of
Transportation, shall promulgate regulations to implement this section.
of 3